Maine, session 132, LD2088.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §2594-E, sub-§5, ¶E, as amended by PL 2019, c. 627, Pt. B,
§12, is further amended to read:
E. Requirements for collaborative agreements and practice agreements under section
2594‑F, including uniform standards and forms;
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §2594-F, sub-§1, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 627, Pt. B, §13
and amended by PL 2025, c. 316, §3, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §2594-F, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 627, Pt. B, §13 and
amended by PL 2025, c. 316, §3, is further amended to read:
4. Consultation. A physician associate shall may, as indicated by a patient's condition,
the education, competencies and experience of the physician associate and the standards of
care, consult with, collaborate with or refer the patient to an appropriate physician or other
health care professional. The level of consultation required under this subsection is
determined by the practice setting, including a physician employer, physician group
Page 1 - 132LR2828(03)

practice or private practice, or by the system of credentialing and granting of privileges of
a health care facility. A physician must be accessible to the physician associate at all times
for consultation. Consultation may occur electronically or through telecommunication and
includes communication, task sharing and education among all members of a health care
team.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §2594-F, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 627, Pt. B, §13 and
amended by PL 2025, c. 316, §3, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 32 MRSA §3270-E, sub-§5, ¶E, as amended by PL 2019, c. 627, Pt. B,
§16, is further amended to read:
E. Requirements for collaborative agreements and practice agreements under section
3270‑G, including uniform standards and forms;
Sec. 6. 32 MRSA §3270-G, sub-§1, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 627, Pt. B, §17
and amended by PL 2025, c. 316, §3, is repealed.
Sec. 7. 32 MRSA §3270-G, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 627, Pt. B, §17 and
amended by PL 2025, c. 316, §3, is further amended to read:
4. Consultation. A physician associate shall may, as indicated by a patient's condition,
the education, competencies and experience of the physician associate and the standards of
care, consult with, collaborate with or refer the patient to an appropriate physician or other
health care professional. The level of consultation required under this subsection is
determined by the practice setting, including a physician employer, physician group
practice, or private practice, or by the system of credentialing and granting of privileges of
a health care facility. A physician must be accessible to the physician associate at all times
for consultation. Consultation may occur electronically or through telecommunication and
includes communication, task sharing and education among all members of a health care
team.
Sec. 8. 32 MRSA §3270-G, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 627, Pt. B, §17 and
amended by PL 2025, c. 316, §3, is repealed.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2828(03)